Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2271
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations to establish procedures and standards to
implement the intent of sections 81-2268 to 81-2271.

Laws 1993, LB 801, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 893;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 38.